Hawaii statutes.
[§201-13.7] Federal funds. Where the
governor or the department with the approval of the governor is able to secure
federal funds made available under any act of the Congress of the United States
to be expended in connection with or for planning grants and community
development block grants, the governor or department shall have the power to
enter into such undertakings with the proper officers or agencies of the
federal government. The department may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 as
may be necessary to administer and effectuate federal grants and programs that
it has been assigned. [L 1987, c 336, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next